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1.DESCRIPTION
(a) DIAGNOSIS SYSTEM

Whentroubleshooting multiplexOBD (M -OBD) vehicles,
the only difference from the usual troubleshooting proce-
dureisthatyouconnectthe hand —-heldtestertovenhicle,
and read off various data output from the vehicle’s power
tilt and telescopic steering ECU.

The power tilt and telescopic steering ECU records the
applicable DTCs when the computer detects a malfunc-
tion in the computer itself or its circuit.
TochecktheDTCs,connectahand  —heldtestertoDLC3
onthevehicle.Thehand -heldtesterenablesyouto
erase the DTCs and activate the several actuators and
checkfreeze frame data and various forms on steering

data.

DATA LINK CONNECTOR 3 (DLC3)

The power tilt and telescopic steering ECU uses ISO
14230 forcommunication. The terminal arrangement of
DLC3complieswithSAEJ 1962 andmatchesthelSO
14230format.

Terminal No.

Connection

Voltage or Resistance Condition

7

Bus + Line

Pulse generation During transmission

4

Chassis Ground

<> BodyGround 1 Q orless Always

16

Battery Positive

<> BodyGround9 -14V Always

LAND CRUISER (W/G) (RM6 16E)

HINT:
If you
when

r display shows "UNABLE TO CONNECT TO VEHICLE”
you have connectedthe cable ofhand -heldtesterto

DLC3, turnedtheignition switch ON and operated the hand -
held tester, there is a problem on the vehicle side or tester side.

(1) If communication is normalwhenthetesteris con-
nected to another vehicle, inspect DLC3 on the orig-
inal vehicle.

If communication is still not possible when the tester
is connected to another vehicle, the problem is
probably in the tester itself, so consult the service
department listed in the tester’s operator’s manual.
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DIAGNOSIS INSPECTION

Check the DTC

(1) Preparethehand -heldtester.

(2) Connectthehand -heldtesterto DLC3 atthe lower
of the instrument panel.

(8) Turntheignition switch ON and turnthe hand -held
tester switch ON.

(4) Usethehand -heldtestertocheckthe DTCsand
freeze frame data, note or print them (See the oper-
ator’s manual for operating instructions.).

(5) See page DI-413 to confirm the details of the DTC.

Clear the DTC

The following actions will erase the DTC and freeze frame

data.

Whenusingthehand -heldtester:
Operatingthehand -heldtestertoerasethe DTCs
(See the operator’s manual for operating instruc-
tions.).

»  Whennotusingthehand -heldtester:
Disconnecting the battery terminals.



